Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6890XC (1) 91 ms/js S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 356.38 County jail cost-benefit 1 analysis ââ study. 2 1. Before a county approves a project to build a new jail, 3 renovate fifty percent or more of the existing jail property, 4 or expand the grounds or structure of the jail, a county shall 5 conduct a study to determine the cost difference between the 6 project and contracting with another county to utilize the 7 other countyâs jail facilities. 8 2. The study shall include all of the following metrics: 9 a. The average monthly total prisoners booked into the 10 current jail, including the following information: 11 (1) County residents booked into the jail compared to 12 noncounty residents booked into the jail. 13 (2) Those booked at the current jail compared with those 14 needing to be booked at a jail in a different county but whose 15 case originated in the county. 16 b. The average food and medical costs per prisoner per year. 17 c. The average annual staffing costs. 18 d. The average annual equipment costs including 19 depreciation, replacement costs, and required planning costs 20 for the following five years. 21 e. The average costs for transporting prisoners to and from 22 the jail. 23 f. A list of surrounding countiesâ jails including the 24 following information: 25 (1) The rated capacities of each jail. 26 (2) The actual capacity of each jail. 27 3. The study shall be accessible to the public and available 28 for review upon request and at each meeting at which the county 29 considers the measure of the project. 30 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 31 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 32